Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-285
Irrigation water reuse pit, defined.

Irrigation water reuse pit shall mean an excavation constructed to capture, for reuse, runoff resulting from ground water irrigation or a structure designed for the purpose of water impoundment which is used for this same purpose so long as the capacity of the facility does not exceed fifteen acre-feet.

Laws 1980, LB 908, § 3.